Utah statutes.
39-7-110.   Statutes of limitations affected by military service.

The period of military service is not included in computing any period limited by law, rule, or order for the bringing of any action or proceeding in any court, board, bureau, commission, department, or other agency of government by or against any person in military service or by or against his heirs, executors, administrators, or assigns, whether the cause of action or the right or privilege to institute the action or proceeding has accrued prior to or during the period of military service.

